Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 164.035 is amended to read:
164.035. (1) In a prosecution for theft it is a defense that the defendant acted under an  honest
claim of right, in that:
(a) The defendant was unaware that the property was that of another; or
(b) The defendant reasonably believed that the defendant was  entitled to the property involved
or had a right to acquire or dispose of it as the defendant did.
(2) In a prosecution for extortion committed by instilling in the victim a  fear that the victim or
another person would be  charged with a crime, it is a defense that the defendant reasonably be-
lieved the threatened charge to be true and  that the sole purpose of the defendant was to compel
or induce the  victim to take reasonable action to make good the wrong which was the subject of
the threatened charge.
(3) In a prosecution for theft by receiving, it is a defense that the defendant received, retained,
concealed or disposed of the property with the intent of restoring it to the owner.
(4) It is a defense that the property involved was that of the defendant’s spouse,  unless the
parties were not living together as spouses in a marriage and  were living in separate abodes at the
time of the alleged theft.
(5) In a prosecution for theft, it is a defense that:
(a) The defendant  is an animal holding agency, as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act,
or an employee, volunteer or other agent acting on behalf of an animal holding agency; and
(b) The defendant complied with the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Animal holding agency” means a licensed animal rescue entity, as defined in  ORS
609.415, that:
(A) Is a nonprofit organization that operates out of a physical building,  with a published
address, that is open to the public at least five days per week; or
(B) Is designated by a county  or municipal animal control agency by contract to accept,
hold or dispose of cats on behalf of the county or municipality.
(b) “Cat” means a member of the species Felis catus or a hybrid of that species.
(c) “Nonprofit organization”  means an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of the  Internal
Revenue Code.
Enrolled House Bill 3604 (HB 3604-A) Page 1
(2) An animal  holding agency, or the employee, volunteer or other agent acting on behalf
of an animal holding agency, that takes possession of, keeps or  disposes of a cat as provided
in this section is immune from civil liability for conduct described in this section.
(3) Upon taking possession of a cat, an animal holding agency shall:
(a) Record the identity and contact information for the  person who transferred the cat
to the animal holding agency; and
(b) Verify whether the  person who transferred the cat to the animal holding agency be-
lieves the cat is unowned, stray or abandoned.
(4) If the person  who transferred a cat to the animal holding agency believes the cat is
unowned, stray or abandoned, the animal holding agency:
(a)(A) Shall keep the cat in a facility operated by the animal holding agency that meets
the requirements established by the State Department of Agriculture by rule for  that type
of facility; or
(B) May keep the cat in a foster program operated by the animal holding agency, if the
cat is pregnant, nursing or neonatal;
(b) Shall, within 24  hours of taking possession of the cat, post on the animal holding
agency’s website a description and photograph of the cat  and the location and date the cat
was found;
(c) Shall report to the municipal animal control agency in  the area where the cat was
found; and
(d) Shall take other reasonable steps to notify the owner of the cat that  the animal
holding agency has  possession of the cat, including providing notice as described in sub-
section (6) of this section, as applicable.
(5)(a) An animal holding agency shall keep a cat  in accordance with the following mini-
mum holding periods:
(A) If the cat is without a license, identification tag or microchip, at least three business
days, or a longer period of time if required by a local ordinance.
(B) If the cat has a license, identification tag or microchip, at  least five business days,
or a longer period of time if required by a local ordinance.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, a business day is a day the animal holding agency is
open to the public.
(6) If an animal holding agency is able to identify the owner of a cat, the animal  holding
agency shall, as soon as is practicable, provide notice to the owner that includes:
(a) The address of the facility where the cat is being kept;
(b) The procedures for redeeming the cat, including  any reasonable fees established by
the animal holding agency; and
(c) The consequences for failure to timely redeem the cat.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 98.005,  if the owner of a cat does not redeem the cat during the
holding period required by subsection (5) of this section, and the animal holding agency  pro-
vided notice as required by subsection (6) of this section, if the animal  holding agency was
able to identify the owner, the animal holding agency shall be the  owner of the cat after the
expiration of the holding period.
(8) Upon taking ownership of a cat as described in subsection  (7) of this section, an ani-
mal holding agency may  dispose of the cat through any lawful means, including but not
limited to offering the  cat for adoption, transferring the cat to another agency or
euthanizing the cat.
(9)(a) An animal holding  agency shall provide any necessary medical care, including hu-
mane euthanasia, as  determined by a licensed veterinarian, to a cat during the holding period
described in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) An animal holding  agency shall provide species-appropriate preventative health care,
as directed by a licensed veterinarian, including implementing  protocols that strengthen re-
sistance to disease and minimize exposure to disease.
Enrolled House Bill 3604 (HB 3604-A) Page 2
(10) An animal holding agency shall keep, for a period of  at least one year, all records
required by ORS 609.415  applicable to a cat that an animal holding agency keeps or makes
disposition of under this section, as well as a record of the location  where a cat was found
and the name and address, if known, of the individual who found the cat.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3604 (HB 3604-A) Page 3